Texas, session 892, HB287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter Z, Chapter 271, Local Government Code, is amended by adding Section 271.909 to read as follows: Sec. 271.909.  AUTHORITY OF POLITICAL SUBDIVISION TO ACQUIRE REAL PROPERTY OUTSIDE JURISDICTION FOR CERTAIN PURPOSES. Except as otherwise provided by law, a political subdivision may not acquire by any method, including by gift, devise, lease, purchase, or eminent domain, real property outside the boundaries of any county that the political subdivision is located in if the property will be used for the taking or transportation of water. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.